Hawaii statutes.
§832-15 Commitment to await requisition;
bail. If from the examination before the judge it appears that the person
held is the person charged with having committed the crime alleged and, except
in cases arising under section 832-6, that the person has fled from justice,
the judge must, by a warrant reciting the accusation, commit the person to the
county jail for such a time not exceeding thirty days and specified in the
warrant, as will enable the arrest of the accused to be made under a warrant of
the governor on a requisition of the executive authority of the state having
jurisdiction of the offense, unless the accused give bail as provided in
section 832-16, or until the accused shall be legally discharged. [L 1941, c
99, §15; RL 1945, §10645; RL 1955, §250-15; HRS §713-15; am L 1970, c 188, §39;
ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next